Illinois, session 104th, SB3741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by changing Section 2310-90 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-90)  (was 20 ILCS 2310/55.09)8    Sec. 2310-90. Laboratories; fees; Public Health Laboratory 9Services Revolving Fund. To maintain physical, chemical, 10bacteriological, and biological laboratories; to make 11examinations of milk, water, atmosphere, sewage, wastes, and 12other substances, and equipment and processes relating 13thereto; to make diagnostic tests for diseases and tests for 14the evaluation of health hazards considered necessary for the 15protection of the people of the State; and to assess a 16reasonable fee for services provided as established by 17regulation, under the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 18which shall not exceed the Department's actual costs to 19provide these services.20    Excepting fees collected under the Newborn Metabolic 21Screening Act and the Lead Poisoning Prevention Act, all fees 22shall be deposited into the Public Health Laboratory Services 23Revolving Fund. Other State and federal funds related to   SB3741- 2 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1laboratory services may also be deposited into the Fund, and 2all interest that accrues on the moneys in the Fund shall be 3deposited into the Fund.4    Moneys shall be appropriated from the Fund solely for the 5purposes of testing specimens submitted in support of 6Department programs established for the protection of human 7health, welfare, and safety, and for testing specimens 8submitted by physicians and other health care providers, to 9determine whether chemically hazardous, biologically 10infectious substances, or other disease causing conditions are 11present.12(Source: P.A. 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.) 13    Section 10. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 14changing Section 1-10 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)16    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)17    Sec. 1-10. Application. 18    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 19bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 20first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 21be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 22provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 23prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 24Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant   SB3741- 3 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 2instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 3solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 4July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 5Code and its intent.6    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 7funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 8assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:9        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 10    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 11    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 12    this Code.13        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 14    Section 20-80.15        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 16    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.17        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 18    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 19    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 20    that individual.21        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.22        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 23    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 24    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 25    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 26    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate   SB3741- 4 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 2    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 3    contract.4        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 5    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 6    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 7    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 8    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 9    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 10    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 11    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 12    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.13        (8) (Blank).14        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 15    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.16        (10) (Blank). 17        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 18    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 19    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 20    design-build agreements entered into according to the 21    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 22    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.23        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 24    professional and artistic services entered into by the 25    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 26    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through   SB3741- 5 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 2    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 3    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 4    as well as the final approval by the members of the 5    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.6        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 7    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 8    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 9    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 10    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 11    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 12    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 13    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 14    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 15    of the terms of the contract. 16        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 17    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 18    science services in consultation with and subject to the 19    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 20    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 21    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 22    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 23    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 24    writing with justification, waive any certification 25    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 26    for services which are currently provided by members of a   SB3741- 6 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 2    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 3    subcontracting shall be followed.4        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 5    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 6        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 7    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 8    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.9        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 10    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 11    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 12    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 13    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 14    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 15    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 16    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 17    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 18    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 19    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 20    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 21    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 22    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 23    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 24    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 25    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 26    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section   SB3741- 7 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 2    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 3    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 4    the Illinois Municipal Code. 5        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 6    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 7    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 8    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 9        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 10    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 11    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 12    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 13    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 14    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 15    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 16    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 17    Medical Cannabis Program Act.18        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 19    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 20    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 21    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 22    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 23    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 24    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 25    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 26    to fall within this exemption and if the process is   SB3741- 8 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 2    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 3    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 4    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 5    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 6    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 7    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 8    the procurement of goods and services identified in 9    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 10    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 11    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 12    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 13    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 14    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 15    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 16    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 17    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 18    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 19    description of the supply or service provided, the total 20    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 21    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 22    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 23    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 24    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 25    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 26    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the   SB3741- 9 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 2    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 3    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).4        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 5    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 6    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 7    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 8    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 9    complete the job application process and be considered for 10    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 11    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 12    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 13    the essential functions of the position held by that 14    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 15    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 16    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 17    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 18    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 19    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 20    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 21        For purposes of this paragraph (19):22        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 23    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 24    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 25    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 26    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.  SB3741- 10 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 2    directly assists an individual with a disability in 3    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 4    device.5        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 6    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 7    describing an individual with a disability. 8        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 9    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 10    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 11    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 12    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 13    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 14    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section 15    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 16        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 17    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 18    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 19    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 20    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 22    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 23    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 24    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 25    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 26    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or   SB3741- 11 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 2    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 3    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 4    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 5    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 6    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 7    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 8        (22) Contracts for project management services and 9    system integration services required for the completion of 10    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 11    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 12    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 13    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 14    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 15    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 16    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 17    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 18    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 19        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 20    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 21    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 22    good faith determination that it is necessary and 23    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 24    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 25    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 26    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A   SB3741- 12 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 2    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 3    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 4    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 5        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 6    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 7    announcements, and public awareness and education 8    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 9    providers of those services that inform the public on 10    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 11        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 12    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 13    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 14    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 15    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 16    shall only be used for products and services procured 17    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 18    procurements may include those necessary to design and 19    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 20    services. The procurements may include, but are not 21    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 22    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 23    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 24    technical assistance and professional development, design 25    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 26    implement management and operational structures, and   SB3741- 13 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 2    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 3    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 4    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 5    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 6    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 7    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 8    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 9    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 10    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 11    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 12    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 13    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 14    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 15    after July 1, 2027. 16        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 17    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 18    particularly minority candidates for employment, 19    including: 20            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 21        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;22            (B) production of recruitment materials; and23            (C) other services related to recruitment and 24        retention of State employees.25        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 26    if the State agency has made a good faith determination   SB3741- 14 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 2    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 3    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 4    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 5    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 6    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 7    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 8    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 9    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 10    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 11    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 12        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 13    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 14    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 15    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 16    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 17    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 18    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 19    within this exemption. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 21with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 22after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 23paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 24or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 25procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 26of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the   SB3741- 15 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 2Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 3report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 4November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 5annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 6chief procurement officer. 7    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 8procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 9Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 10Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 11technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 12Illinois Power Agency Act. 13    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 14and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 15Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 16procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 17Illinois Lottery Law. 18    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 19Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 20assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 21to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 22facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 23Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 24of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 25of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 26costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the   SB3741- 16 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 2full duration of construction.3    (f) (Blank). 4    (g) (Blank).5    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 6contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 711-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 8    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 9necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 10expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 11Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 12privilege. 13    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 14Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 15of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 16Board Act. 17    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 18contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 19Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 20appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 21    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 22Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 23services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 24Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 25funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 26Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon.   SB3741- 17 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 2funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 3assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 4Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 5necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 6Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 7the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 8Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 9(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 10103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 116-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 12eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)14    Sec. 1-10. Application. 15    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 16bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 17first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 18be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 19provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 20prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 21Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 22entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 23instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 24solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 25July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this   SB3741- 18 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1Code and its intent.2    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 3funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 4assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:5        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 6    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 7    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 8    this Code.9        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 10    Section 20-80.11        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 12    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.13        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 14    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 15    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 16    that individual.17        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.18        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 19    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 20    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 21    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 22    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 23    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 24    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 25    contract.26        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated   SB3741- 19 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 2    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 3    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 4    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 5    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 6    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 7    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 8    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.9        (8) (Blank).10        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 11    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.12        (10) (Blank). 13        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 14    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 15    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 16    design-build agreements entered into according to the 17    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 18    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.19        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 20    professional and artistic services entered into by the 21    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 22    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 23    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 24    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 25    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 26    as well as the final approval by the members of the   SB3741- 20 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.2        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 3    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 4    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 5    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 6    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 7    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 8    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 9    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 10    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 11    of the terms of the contract. 12        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 13    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 14    science services in consultation with and subject to the 15    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 16    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 17    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 18    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 19    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 20    writing with justification, waive any certification 21    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 22    for services which are currently provided by members of a 23    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 24    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 25    subcontracting shall be followed.26        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13),   SB3741- 21 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 2        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 3    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 4    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.5        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 6    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 7    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 8    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 9    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 10    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 11    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 12    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 13    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 14    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 15    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 16    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 17    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 18    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 19    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 20    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 21    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 22    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 23    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 24    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 25    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 26    the Illinois Municipal Code.   SB3741- 22 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 2    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 3    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 4    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 5        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 6    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 7    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 8    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 9    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 10    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 11    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 12    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 13    Medical Cannabis Program Act.14        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 15    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 16    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 17    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 18    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 19    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 20    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 21    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 22    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 23    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 24    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 25    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 26    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for   SB3741- 23 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 2    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 3    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 4    the procurement of goods and services identified in 5    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 6    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 7    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 8    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 9    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 10    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 11    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 12    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 13    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 14    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 15    description of the supply or service provided, the total 16    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 17    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 18    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 19    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 20    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 21    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 22    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 23    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 24    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 25    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).26        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments,   SB3741- 24 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 2    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 3    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 4    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 5    complete the job application process and be considered for 6    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 7    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 8    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 9    the essential functions of the position held by that 10    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 11    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 12    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 13    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 14    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 15    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 16    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 17        For purposes of this paragraph (19):18        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 19    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 20    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 21    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 22    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.23        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 24    directly assists an individual with a disability in 25    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 26    device.  SB3741- 25 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 2    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 3    describing an individual with a disability. 4        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 6    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 7    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 8    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 9    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 10    Utilities Act, a grid auditor pursuant to Section 11    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act, a facilitator, 12    expert, or consultant pursuant to Sections 16-126.2 and 13    16-202 of the Public Utilities Act, a procurement monitor 14    pursuant to Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act, 15    an ombudsperson pursuant to Section 20-145 of the Public 16    Utilities Act, or consultants and experts pursuant to 17    Section 5-15 of the Utility Data Access Act. 18        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 19    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 20    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 21    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 22    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 23    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 24    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 25    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 26    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification   SB3741- 26 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 2    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 3    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 4    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 5    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 6    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 7    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 8    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 9    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 10        (22) Contracts for project management services and 11    system integration services required for the completion of 12    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 13    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 14    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 15    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 16    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 17    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 18    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 19    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 20    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 21        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 22    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 23    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 24    good faith determination that it is necessary and 25    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 26    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a   SB3741- 27 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 2    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 3    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 4    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 5    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 6    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 7        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 8    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 9    announcements, and public awareness and education 10    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 11    providers of those services that inform the public on 12    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 13        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 14    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 15    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 16    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 17    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 18    shall only be used for products and services procured 19    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 20    procurements may include those necessary to design and 21    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 22    services. The procurements may include, but are not 23    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 24    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 25    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 26    technical assistance and professional development, design   SB3741- 28 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 2    implement management and operational structures, and 3    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 4    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 5    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 6    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 7    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 8    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 9    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 10    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 11    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 12    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 13    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 14    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 15    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 16    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 17    after July 1, 2027. 18        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 19    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 20    particularly minority candidates for employment, 21    including: 22            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 23        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;24            (B) production of recruitment materials; and25            (C) other services related to recruitment and 26        retention of State employees.  SB3741- 29 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 2    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 3    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 4    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 5    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 6    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 7    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 8    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 9    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 10    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 11    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 12    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 13    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 14        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 15    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 16    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 17    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 18    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 19    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 20    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 21    within this exemption. 22    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 23with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 24after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 25paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 26or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate   SB3741- 30 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 2of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 3contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 4Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 5report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 6November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 7annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 8chief procurement officer. 9    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 10procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 11Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 12Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 13technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 14Illinois Power Agency Act. 15    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 16and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 17Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 18procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 19Illinois Lottery Law. 20    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 21Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 22assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 23to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 24facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 25Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 26of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range   SB3741- 31 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 2costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 3construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 4full duration of construction.5    (f) (Blank). 6    (g) (Blank).7    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 8contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 911-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 10    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 11necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 12expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 13Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 14privilege. 15    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 16Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 17of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 18Board Act. 19    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 20contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 21Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 22appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 23    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 24Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 25services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 26Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private   SB3741- 32 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 2Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 3    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 4funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 5assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 6Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 7necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 8Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 9the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 10Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 11(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 12103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 136-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 14eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26; 15revised 1-12-26.) 16    Section 15. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 17changing Section 5-5 as follows: 18    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)19    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 20rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 21of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 22will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 23which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 24hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other   SB3741- 33 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 2services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 3office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 4home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 5remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 6health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 7clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 8and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 9for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 10to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 11item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 12corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 13a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 14physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 15dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 16a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 17optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 18diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 19services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 20intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 21disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 22disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 23and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 24adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 25assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 26includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a   SB3741- 34 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 2instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 3transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 4(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 5in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 6Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 7sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 8discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 9arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 10treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 11a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 12Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 13including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 14treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 15of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 16term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 17care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 18treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 20comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 21purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 22approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 23under the medical assistance program under this Article for 24persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 25Article. 26    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code,   SB3741- 35 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 2shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 3persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 4under this Article. 5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 6tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 7Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 8tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 9counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 10through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 11the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 12eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 13shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 14federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 15433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 16through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 17limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 18interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 19administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 20developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 21Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 2295.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 23understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 24plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 25Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 26Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal   SB3741- 36 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1approval.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 3Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 4for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 5physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 6test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 7other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 8documentation. 9    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 10Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 11shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 12vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 13enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 14that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 15medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 16managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 17school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 18under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 19individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 20for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 21of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 22the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 23KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 24Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 25payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 26MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses.   SB3741- 37 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 2and Family Services may provide the following services to 3persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 4participating in education, training or employment programs 5operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 6the Department of Public Aid:7        (1) dental services provided by or under the 8    supervision of a dentist; and 9        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 10    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 11    the person may select.12    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 13and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 14who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 15assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 16services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 17corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 18the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 19caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 20practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 21supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 22profession.23    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 24set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 25United States District Court for the Northern District of 26Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v.   SB3741- 38 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 2the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 3than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 4of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 5provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 6assistance program. 7    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 8the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 9deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 10dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 11effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 12sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 13remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 15subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 16allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 17cost to render dental services through an enrolled 18not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 19enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 20assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 21include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 22Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 23Department, through which dental services covered under this 24Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 25process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 26dental services rendered under this provision.   SB3741- 39 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 2Department shall file administrative rules updating the 3Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 4by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 5    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 6and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 7school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 8delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 9to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 10establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 11and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 12requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 13published by the Department that establishes the requirements 14for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 15Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 16developing the program requirements to consider the different 17geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 18State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 19provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 20to participate in the school-based dental program administered 21by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 22construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 23district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 24school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 25the school-based dental program administered by the 26Department.   SB3741- 40 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 2classify the medical services to be provided only in 3accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 45-2. 5    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 6provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 7elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 8diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 9short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 10a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 11formula is medically necessary. 12    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 13and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 14mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 15individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 16medical assistance under this Article, as follows:17        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 18    years of age. 19        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 20    age or older.21        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 22    medically necessary by the individual's health care 23    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 24    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 25    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 26    factors.  SB3741- 41 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 2    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 3    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 4    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 5    practice medicine in all of its branches. 6        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 7    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 8    all of its branches. 9        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 10    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 11    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 12    or physician assistant. 13        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 14    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 15    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 16    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 17    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 18    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 19    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 20copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 21coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 22sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 23to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 24health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 25pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 26U.S.C. 223).   SB3741- 42 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 2instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 3frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 4tool.5    For purposes of this Section:6    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 7diagnostic mammography.8    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 9is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 10an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 11subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 12breast.13    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 14breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 15including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 16image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 17less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 18breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 19includes breast tomosynthesis.20    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 21involves the acquisition of projection images over the 22stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 23three-dimensional images of the breast.24    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 25Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 26agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in   SB3741- 43 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 2Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 3would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 4Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 5111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 618031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 7of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 8paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 9tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 10authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 11U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 12for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 13this paragraph.14    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 15that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 16include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 17Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 18Radiology.19    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 20quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 21be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 22same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 23increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 24January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 25breast tomosynthesis.26    The Department shall convene an expert panel including   SB3741- 44 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 2facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 3quality standards for mammography.4    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 5breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 6by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 7treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 8program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 9cancer treatment quality program.10    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 11representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 12treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 13doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 14of FDA-approved breast imaging technologies, breast surgeons, 15reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, and primary care 16providers to establish quality standards for breast cancer 17treatment.18    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 19establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 20qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 21These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 22hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 23Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 24of the provision set forth in this paragraph.25    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 26individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography,   SB3741- 45 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 2months, of the importance and benefit of screening 3mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 4cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 5reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 6their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 7evaluation.8    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 9primary care providers with respect to their female patients 10over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 11goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 12form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 13who meet that goal.14    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 15patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 16cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 17program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 18mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 19site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 20site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 21after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 22include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 23Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 24metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 25be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 26those served by the pilot program compared to similarly   SB3741- 46 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 2    The Department shall require all networks of care to 3develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 4in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 5patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 6Department shall require all networks of care to include 7access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 8academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 9in-network covered benefit.10    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 11for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 12marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 13persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 14approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 15reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 16persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 17cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 18progression. The Department shall disallow any 19preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 20human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 21    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 22eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 23receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 2412-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 25Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 26conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by   SB3741- 47 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1the Department.2    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 3recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 4prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 5disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 6referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 7licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 8hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 9The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 10coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 11addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 12Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 13of Human Services. 14    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 15pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 16from the Department on the availability of services under any 17program providing case management services for addicted 18individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 19for other social services that may be needed by addicted 20individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 21    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 22Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 23of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 24a public awareness campaign, may provide information 25concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 26addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs   SB3741- 48 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 2to recipients of medical assistance. 3    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 4nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 5recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 6abuse. 7    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 8governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 9as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 10advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 11the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 12providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 13information dissemination and educational activities for 14medical and health care providers, and consistency in 15procedures to the Illinois Department. 16    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 17Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 18for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 19Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 20projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 21represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 22rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 23Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 24require that the sponsor organization be a medical 25organization. 26    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with   SB3741- 49 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 2outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 3alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 4necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 5Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 6obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 7medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 8in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 9the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 10        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 11    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 12    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 13    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 14    such services. 15        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 16    financial incentives to encourage the development of 17    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 18        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 19    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 20    services above the level usually offered through the 21    medical assistance program. 22    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 23qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 24delivery of high quality medical services. These 25qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 26Department and may be higher than qualifications for   SB3741- 50 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 2sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 3for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 4written approval of the Illinois Department. 5    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 6practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 7services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 8choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 9all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 10provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 11certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 12Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 13service providers. 14    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 15States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 16implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 17    The Illinois Department shall require health care 18providers to maintain records that document the medical care 19and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 20under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 21of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 22provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 23except that if an audit is initiated within the required 24retention period then the records must be retained until the 25audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 26Illinois Department shall require health care providers to   SB3741- 51 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 2the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 3providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 4Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 5medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 6business and professional records sufficient to fully and 7accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 8the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 9assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 10promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 11regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 12prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 13eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 14each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 15such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 16be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 17such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 18have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 19post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 20basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 21that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 22for which payment is being made are actually being received by 23eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 24(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 25Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 26for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as   SB3741- 52 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 2and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 3the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 4updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 5Section 5-5.12. 6    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 7Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 8(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 9procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 10the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 11reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 12procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 13viability of the new system and implement any necessary 14operational or structural changes to its information 15technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 16acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 17    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 18Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 192014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 20procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 21Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 22MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 23purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 24Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 25viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 26operational or structural changes to its information   SB3741- 53 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1technology platforms are implemented. 2    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 3medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 4group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 5Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 6all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 7interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 8associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 9institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 10health care services in this State under this Article. 11    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 12medical services desiring to participate in the medical 13assistance program established under this Article disclose, 14under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 15by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 16regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 17inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 18liens for the Illinois Department. 19    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 20period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 21period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 22the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 23the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 24Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 25disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 26process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without   SB3741- 54 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1penalty. 2    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 3enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 4of the vendor.5    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 6period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 7subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 8the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 9category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 10establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 11which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 12financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 13certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 14unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 15reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 16screening as required by federal or State law.17    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 18by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 19each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 20screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 21federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 22the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 23each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 24hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 25of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 26the conditional enrollment period.   SB3741- 55 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 2payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 3resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 4by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 5later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 6medical goods or services were provided, with the following 7exceptions:8        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 9    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 10    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 11    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 12    complete.13        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 14    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 15    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 16    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 17    until the provider has been notified of the error.18        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 19    Department initiates the monthly billing process.20        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 21    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 22    when local government funds finance federal participation 23    for claims payments. 24    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 25a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 26filed within 180 days after the Department determines the   SB3741- 56 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 2Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 3to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 4adjudication by the primary payer.5    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 6calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 7prescreening information, new admissions with associated 8admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 9Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 10Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 11directly to the Department of Human Services using required 12admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 13documents, including all prescreening information, must be 14submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 15to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 16verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 17been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 18rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 19the admission transaction has been completed.20    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 21with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 22payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 23shall have no liability for payment of those claims.24    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 25privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 26agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department   SB3741- 57 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1access to confidential and other information and data 2necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 3other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 4limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 5certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 6reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 7employment; supplemental security income; social security 8numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 9National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 10exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 11corporate information; and death records.12    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 13State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 14into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 15which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 16for medical assistance program integrity functions and 17oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 18cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 19compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 20appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 21minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 22the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 23agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 24agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 25but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 26Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of   SB3741- 58 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 2Professional Regulation.3    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 4shall set forth a request for information to identify the 5benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 6claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 7and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 8rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 9adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 10data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 11clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 12post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 13management system with link analysis. Such a request for 14information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 15or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 16take any action or acquire any products or services. 17    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 18procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 19acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 20devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 21provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 22immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 23and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 24medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 25consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 26the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for   SB3741- 59 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 2rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 3alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 4or replacements of any device or equipment previously 5authorized for such recipient by the Department. 6Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 7the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 8wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 9wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 10and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 11methods other than actual acquisition costs.12    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 13durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 14organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 15Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 16bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 17recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 18of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 19must meet the accreditation requirement.20    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 21needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 22cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 23under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 24managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 25of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 26equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and   SB3741- 60 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 2Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 3products and associated services) through the State's 4assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 5staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 6Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 7(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 8costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 9(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 10cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 11federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 12governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 13settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 14enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 15recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 16similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 17refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 18of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 19be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 20new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 21authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 22organizations. 23    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 24prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 25Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 26effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common   SB3741- 61 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 2non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 3development of non-institutional services in areas of the 4State where they are not currently available or are 5undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 6law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 7increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 837 for applicants for institutional and home and 9community-based long term care; if and only if federal 10approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 11with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 12or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 13amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 142013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 15institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 16(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 17permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 18for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 19receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 20to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 21Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 22agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 23institutional and home and community-based long term care 24interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 25implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 26community-based services in circumstances where federal   SB3741- 62 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1approval has been granted. 2    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 3cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 4compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 5appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 6and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 7services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 8medical assistance under this Code. 9    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 10General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 111979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 12        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 13    medical services by public aid recipients; 14        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 15    the various medical services by medical vendors; 16        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 17    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 18        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 19    Illinois Department. 20    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 21ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 22include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 23Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 24Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 25required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 26Act, and filing such additional copies with the State   SB3741- 63 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 2as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 3Library Act. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 11rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 12any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 13of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 14with Section 5-5e. 15    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 16cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 17necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 18of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 19cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 20renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 21benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 22of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 23requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 24under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 25kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 26emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department.   SB3741- 64 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 2certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 3and the services under this Section shall be limited to 4services associated with kidney transplantation. 5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 6contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved forms of 7medication assisted treatment prescribed for the treatment of 8alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid dependence shall be 9covered under both fee-for-service and managed care medical 10assistance programs for persons who are otherwise eligible for 11medical assistance under this Article and shall not be subject 12to any (1) utilization control, other than those established 13under the American Society of Addiction Medicine patient 14placement criteria, (2) prior authorization mandate, (3) 15lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) limitations on 16dosage. 17    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 18for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 19medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 20fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 21and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 22under the medical assistance program for persons who are 23otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 24As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 25binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 26opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited   SB3741- 65 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 2approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 3Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 4provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 5assistance program.6    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 7coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 8marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 9are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 10United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 11pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 12services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 13transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 14transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 15counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 16individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 17risk of HIV infection.18    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 191905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 20reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 21qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 22to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 23dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 24Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 25dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 26    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date   SB3741- 66 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 2approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 3family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 4to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 5poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 6beginning no later than December 1, 2022.7    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 8and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 9electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 10(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 11I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 12Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 13(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 14the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 15become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 16subject to criteria established in accordance with all 17applicable laws.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 19community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 20interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 21assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 22Palliative Care Act.23    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 2412 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 25102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 26services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the   SB3741- 67 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 2or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 3program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 4State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 5paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 6standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 7    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 8medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 9reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 10screening test for the presence of metachromatic 11leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 12Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 13Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 15subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 16hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 17tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 18Public Act 103-909) to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and 19required to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than 20the fee charged by the Department of Public Health. The 21Department shall seek federal approval before the 22implementation of the newborn screening test fees by the 23Department of Public Health. 24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 25beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 26cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a   SB3741- 68 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 2impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 3Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 4under the medical assistance program for persons who are 5otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 6    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 7medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 8to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 9medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 10eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 11this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 12performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 13restore physical appearance. 14    Subject to federal approval, for dates of services on and 15after January 1, 2026, over-the-counter choline dietary 16supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered under the 17medical assistance program. 18(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 201-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 21Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 90, 22Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-808, eff. 231-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-9, 24eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 25    Section 20. The Newborn Screening Act is amended by   SB3741- 69 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1changing the title of the Act and Sections 0.01 and 2 as 2follows: 3    (410 ILCS 240/Act title)4    An Act concerning health the disease of phenylketonuria 5and other metabolic diseases, designating certain powers and 6duties in relation thereto, providing penalties for violation 7thereof, to repeal an Act therein named and to make an 8appropriation in connection therewith. 9    (410 ILCS 240/0.01)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4902.9)10    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 11Newborn Metabolic Screening Act.12(Source: P.A. 95-695, eff. 11-5-07.) 13    (410 ILCS 240/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4904)14    Sec. 2. General provisions. The Department of Public 15Health shall administer the provisions of this Act and shall:16    (a) Institute and carry on an intensive educational 17program among physicians, hospitals, public health nurses and 18the public concerning disorders included in newborn screening. 19This educational program shall include information about the 20nature of the diseases and examinations for the detection of 21the diseases in early infancy in order that measures may be 22taken to prevent the disabilities resulting from the diseases.23    (a-5) Require that all newborns be screened for the   SB3741- 70 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1presence of certain genetic, metabolic, and congenital 2anomalies, including hearing conditions, as determined by the 3Department, by rule.4    (a-5.1) Require that all blood and biological specimens 5collected pursuant to this Act or the rules adopted under this 6Act be submitted for testing to the nearest Department 7laboratory designated to perform such tests. The following 8provisions shall apply concerning testing:9        (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, the base fee for newborn 10    screening services shall be $118. Beginning July 1, 2026, 11    the Department shall collect an additional newborn 12    screening fee in an amount determined by the Department by 13    rule but not less than an additional $45 per newborn. The 14    Department may develop a reasonable fee structure and may 15    levy additional fees according to such structure to cover 16    the cost of providing these this testing services service 17    and for the follow-up of infants with an abnormal 18    screening test; however, additional fees may be levied no 19    sooner than 6 months prior to the beginning of testing for 20    a new genetic, metabolic, or congenital disorder. All fees 21    Fees collected from the provision of this testing service 22    and all additional newborn screening fees collected under 23    this subsection shall be deposited into placed in the 24    Metabolic Screening and Treatment Fund. Other State and 25    federal funds for expenses related to metabolic hearing or 26    congenital disorder condition screening, follow-up, and   SB3741- 71 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    treatment programs may also be placed in the Fund. Nothing 2    in this Section or this Act shall be construed to 3    override, replace, preempt, or supersede any provision, 4    requirement, or other duty or prohibition enumerated in 5    the Early Hearing Detection and Intervention Act.6        (2) Moneys shall be appropriated from the Fund to the 7    Department solely for the purposes of providing newborn 8    screening, follow-up, and treatment programs, including 9    the Early Hearing Detection and Intervention Program 10    (EHDI) through which the Department provides 11    Cytomegalovirus education and parent-to-parent support. 12    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit any 13    licensed medical facility from collecting additional 14    specimens for testing for metabolic or neonatal diseases 15    or any other diseases or conditions, as it deems fit. Any 16    person violating the provisions of this subsection (a-5.1) 17    is guilty of a petty offense.18        (3) If the Department is unable to provide the 19    screening using the State Laboratory, it shall temporarily 20    provide such screening through an accredited laboratory 21    selected by the Department until the Department has the 22    capacity to provide screening through the State 23    Laboratory. If screening is provided on a temporary basis 24    through an accredited laboratory, the Department shall 25    substitute the fee charged by the accredited laboratory, 26    plus a 5% surcharge for documentation and handling, for   SB3741- 72 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    the fee authorized in this subsection (a-5.1). This 2    paragraph (3) does not apply to hearing screenings. 3    (a-5.2) Maintain a registry of cases, including 4information of importance for the purpose of follow-up 5services to assess long-term outcomes. 6    (a-5.3) Supply the necessary metabolic treatment formulas 7where practicable for diagnosed cases of amino acid metabolism 8disorders, including phenylketonuria, organic acid disorders, 9and fatty acid oxidation disorders for as long as medically 10indicated, when the product is not available through other 11State agencies.12    (a-5.4) Arrange for or provide public health nursing, 13nutrition, and social services and clinical consultation as 14indicated.15    (a-5.5) Utilize the Genetic and Metabolic Diseases 16Advisory Committee established under the Genetic and Metabolic 17Diseases Advisory Committee Act to provide guidance and 18recommendations to the Department's newborn screening program. 19The Genetic and Metabolic Diseases Advisory Committee shall 20review the feasibility and advisability of including 21additional metabolic, genetic, and congenital conditions or 22disorders in the newborn screening panel, according to a 23review protocol applied to each suggested addition to the 24newborn screening panel. The Department shall consider the 25recommendations of the Genetic and Metabolic Diseases Advisory 26Committee in determining whether to include an additional   SB3741- 73 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1disorder in the newborn screening panel prior to proposing an 2administrative rule concerning inclusion of an additional 3disorder in the newborn screening panel. Notwithstanding any 4other provision of law, no new screening may begin prior to the 5occurrence of all the following:6        (1) the establishment and verification of relevant and 7    appropriate performance specifications as defined under 8    the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 9    regulations thereunder for U.S. Food and Drug 10    Administration-cleared or in-house developed methods, 11    performed under an institutional review board-approved 12    protocol, if required;13        (2) the availability of quality assurance testing 14    methodology for the processes set forth in item (1) of 15    this subsection (a-5.5);16        (3) the acquisition and installment by the Department 17    of the equipment necessary to implement the screening 18    tests;19        (4) the establishment of precise threshold values 20    ensuring defined disorder identification for each 21    screening test;22        (5) the authentication of pilot testing achieving each 23    milestone described in items (1) through (4) of this 24    subsection (a-5.5) for each disorder screening test; and25        (6) the authentication of achieving the potential of 26    high throughput standards for statewide volume of each   SB3741- 74 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    disorder screening test concomitant with each milestone 2    described in items (1) through (4) of this subsection 3    (a-5.5). 4    (a-6) (Blank).5    (a-7) (Blank).6    (a-8) (Blank).7    (b) (Blank).8    (c) (Blank).9    (d) (Blank).10    (e) (Blank).11(Source: P.A. 98-440, eff. 8-16-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14; 1299-403, eff. 8-19-15.) 13    Section 25. The Genetic Information Privacy Act is amended 14by changing Section 30 as follows: 15    (410 ILCS 513/30)16    Sec. 30. Disclosure of person tested and test results. 17    (a) No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the 18identity of any person upon whom a genetic test is performed or 19the results of a genetic test in a manner that permits 20identification of the subject of the test, except to the 21following persons:22        (1) The subject of the test or the subject's legally 23    authorized representative. This paragraph does not create 24    a duty or obligation under which a health care provider   SB3741- 75 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    must notify the subject's spouse or legal guardian of the 2    test results, and no such duty or obligation shall be 3    implied. No civil liability or criminal sanction under 4    this Act shall be imposed for any disclosure or 5    nondisclosure of a test result to a spouse by a physician 6    acting in good faith under this paragraph. For the purpose 7    of any proceedings, civil or criminal, the good faith of 8    any physician acting under this paragraph shall be 9    presumed.10        (2) Any person designated in a specific written 11    legally effective authorization for release of the test 12    results executed by the subject of the test or the 13    subject's legally authorized representative. 14        (3) An authorized agent or employee of a health 15    facility or health care provider if the health facility or 16    health care provider itself is authorized to obtain the 17    test results, the agent or employee provides patient care, 18    and the agent or employee has a need to know the 19    information in order to conduct the tests or provide care 20    or treatment.21        (4) A health facility, health care provider, or health 22    care professional that procures, processes, distributes, 23    or uses:24            (A) a human body part from a deceased person with 25        respect to medical information regarding that person; 26        or  SB3741- 76 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1            (B) semen provided prior to the effective date of 2        this Act for the purpose of artificial insemination.3        (5) Health facility staff committees for the purposes 4    of conducting program monitoring, program evaluation, or 5    service reviews.6        (6) In the case of a minor under 18 years of age, the 7    health care provider, health care professional, or health 8    facility who ordered the test shall make a reasonable 9    effort to notify the minor's parent or legal guardian if, 10    in the professional judgment of the health care provider, 11    health care professional, or health facility, notification 12    would be in the best interest of the minor and the health 13    care provider, health care professional, or health 14    facility has first sought unsuccessfully to persuade the 15    minor to notify the parent or legal guardian or after a 16    reasonable time after the minor has agreed to notify the 17    parent or legal guardian, the health care provider, health 18    care professional, or health facility has reason to 19    believe that the minor has not made the notification. This 20    paragraph shall not create a duty or obligation under 21    which a health care provider, health care professional, or 22    health facility must notify the minor's parent or legal 23    guardian of the test results, nor shall a duty or 24    obligation be implied. No civil liability or criminal 25    sanction under this Act shall be imposed for any 26    notification or non-notification of a minor's test result   SB3741- 77 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1    by a health care provider, health care professional, or 2    health facility acting in good faith under this paragraph. 3    For the purpose of any proceeding, civil or criminal, the 4    good faith of any health care provider, health care 5    professional, or health facility acting under this 6    paragraph shall be presumed. 7    (b) All information and records held by a State agency, 8local health authority, or health oversight agency pertaining 9to genetic information shall be strictly confidential and 10exempt from copying and inspection under the Freedom of 11Information Act. The information and records shall not be 12released or made public by the State agency, local health 13authority, or health oversight agency and shall not be 14admissible as evidence nor discoverable in any action of any 15kind in any court or before any tribunal, board, agency, or 16person and shall be treated in the same manner as the 17information and those records subject to the provisions of 18Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil Procedure except 19under the following circumstances:20            (A) when made with the written consent of all 21        persons to whom the information pertains;22            (B) when authorized by Section 5-4-3 of the 23        Unified Code of Corrections;24            (C) when made for the sole purpose of implementing 25        the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and rules; or26            (D) when made under the authorization of the   SB3741- 78 -LRB104 20276 BDA 33727 b1        Illinois Parentage Act of 2015.2    Disclosure shall be limited to those who have a need to 3know the information, and no additional disclosures may be 4made.5    (c) Disclosure by an insurer in accordance with the 6requirements of the Article XL of the Illinois Insurance Code 7shall be deemed compliance with this Section.8(Source: P.A. 98-1046, eff. 1-1-15; 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 9    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 10changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 11that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 12represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 13not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 14made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 15Public Act. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.